Massachusetts, session 194th, H1997.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following:-  
22D. (a) Whoever, being at the time (1) a mandated reporter as defined in section 21 of 
chapter 119, section 1 of chapter 19C, or section 15 of chapter 19A, or (2) a person with 
supervisory responsibility or disciplinary authority over such vulnerable adult by virtue of his or 
her legal, professional or occupational status, or (3) in the course of providing transportation, or 
immediately before or after, as an employee or contracted service provider, has sexual 
intercourse or unnatural sexual intercourse  with, or commits indecent assault and battery upon, a 

of 2 9 vulnerable adult as defined herein, knowing such person to be a vulnerable adult, shall be 
punished. 
(b) Whoever commits sexual intercourse (natural or unnatural) with a vulnerable adult 
shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than twenty years; and 
whoever commits a second or subsequent such offense shall be punished by imprisonment in the 
state prison for life, or for any term of years. Whoever commits an indecent assault and battery 
on a vulnerable adult shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than ten 
years, or by imprisonment in the house of correction for not more than two and one-half years; 
and whoever commits a second or subsequent such offense shall be punished by imprisonment in 
the state prison for not more than twenty years. A prosecution commenced under either section 
of this paragraph shall not be placed on file nor continued without a finding.  
(c) Consent of the vulnerable adult to such sexual intercourse or indecent assault and 
battery shall not constitute a defense or excuse to this offense.  
(d) A vulnerable adult is a person fourteen years of age or older who at the time of the 
offense (1) is admitted to a mental health facility or to a community based or residential facility, 
or (2) is receiving community-based services through the Department of Developmental Services 
or the Department of Mental Health or the Massachusetts Rehabilitation Commission, or (3) is a 
resident of a long-term care facility. 
SECTION 2. Section 178C of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting into the definition of “Sex offense” after the words “aggravated rape under 
section 39 of chapter 277;” the following: “sexual assault of vulnerable adults under section 22D 
of chapter 265;”